Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.330

Running start program—Maximum terms of enrollment for high school credit.

A pupil who enrolls in an institution of higher education in grade eleven may not enroll in postsecondary courses under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.390 for high school credit and postsecondary credit for more than the equivalent of the coursework for two academic years. A pupil who first enrolls in an institution of higher education in grade twelve may not enroll in postsecondary courses under this section for high school credit and postsecondary credit for more than the equivalent of the coursework for one academic year.

[ 1994 c 205 s 4; 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 404.]

NOTES:

Finding—Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28A.225.220.